Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-106
Petition; notice of hearing; report by Chief Water Officer.

The petition for the proposed district shall be published for at least two weeks before the time at which the same is to be presented, in some newspaper printed and published in the county where the petition is presented, together with a notice stating the time of the meeting at which the petition will be presented. A copy of such petition and all maps and other papers filed with the petition shall be filed with the Chief Water Officer of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment for at least four weeks before the date set for such hearing. The Chief Water Officer shall examine such petition, maps, and other papers and, if he or she deems it necessary, shall further examine the proposed district, the works proposed to be purchased, or the location of the works to be constructed. The Chief Water Officer shall prepare a report upon the matter in such form as he or she deems advisable and submit the report to the county board at the meeting set for the hearing of the petition.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 2, p. 270;

Laws 1903, c. 121, § 1, p. 616;

Laws 1909, c. 155, § 1, p. 559;

R.S.1913, § 3458;

Laws 1917, c. 81, § 1, p. 192;

C.S.1922, § 2858;

C.S.1929, § 46-102;

Laws 1933, c. 87, § 1, p. 356;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 46-102;

R.S.1943, § 46-106;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 86;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 61.